Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 19
FUGITIVES AND EXTRADITION

Cross references:

For interstate compacts affecting the subject matter of this article, see article 60 of title 24; for habeas corpus proceedings, see article 45 of title 13.

Section

16-19-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Criminal Extradition Act".

Source:

L. 53:

p. 323, § 29.

CSA:

C. 72, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-32.

16-19-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Executive authority" includes the governor and any person performing the function of governor in a state other than this state.

"Governor" includes any person performing the functions of governor by authority of the law of this state.

"State", referring to a state other than this state, includes any other state or territory, organized or unorganized, of the United States.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 314, § 1.

CSA:

C. 72, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-1.

16-19-103. Fugitives from justice.

Subject to the provisions of this article, the provisions of the constitution of the United States controlling, and any act of congress enacted in pursuance thereof, it is the duty of the governor of this state to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this state.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 314, § 2.

CSA:

C. 72, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-2.

16-19-104. Form of demand.

No demand for the extradition of a person charged with crime in another state shall be recognized by the governor unless in writing alleging, except in cases arising under section 16-19-107, that the accused was present in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and that thereafter he fled from the state, and accompanied by a copy of an indictment found or by information supported by affidavit in the state having jurisdiction of the crime, or by a copy of an affidavit made before a magistrate there, together with a copy of any warrant which was issued thereupon, or by a copy of a judgment of conviction or of a sentence imposed in execution thereof, together with a statement by the executive authority of the demanding state that the person claimed has escaped from confinement or has broken the terms of his bail, probation, or parole. The indictment, information, or affidavit made before the magistrate must substantially charge the person demanded with having committed a crime under the law of that state; and the copy of the indictment, information, affidavit, or judgment of conviction or sentence must be authenticated by the executive authority making the demand.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 315, § 3.

CSA:

C. 72, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-3.

L. 57:

p. 379, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-3.

16-19-105. Governor may investigate case.

When a demand is made upon the governor of this state by the executive authority of another state for the surrender of a person so charged with crime, the governor may call upon the attorney general or any prosecuting officer in this state to investigate or assist in investigating the demand, and to report to him the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether he ought to be surrendered.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 315, § 4.

CSA:

C. 72, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-4.

16-19-106. Extradition of persons imprisoned or awaiting trial.

When it is desired to have returned to this state a person charged in this state with a crime, and such person is imprisoned or is held under criminal proceedings then pending against him in another state, the governor of this state may agree with the executive authority of the other state for the extradition of that person before the conclusion of such proceedings or his term of sentence in the other state, upon condition that such person be returned to the other state at the expense of this state as soon as the prosecution in this state is terminated.

The governor of this state may also surrender on demand of the executive authority of any other state any person in this state who is charged in the manner provided in section 16-19-124 with having violated the laws of the state whose executive authority is making the demand, even though such person left the demanding state involuntarily.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 315, § 5.

CSA:

C. 72, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-5.

16-19-107. Extradition of persons not present where crime committed.

The governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in such other state in the manner provided in section 16-19-104 with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand, and the provisions of this article not otherwise inconsistent shall apply to such cases, even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime and has not fled therefrom.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 316, § 6.

CSA:

C. 72, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-6.

16-19-108. Issue of governor's warrant.

If the governor decides that the demand should be complied with, the governor shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the state seal and be directed to any peace officer or other person whom the governor may think fit to entrust with the execution thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance. Any electronically or electromagnetically transmitted facsimile of a governor's warrant shall be treated as an original document.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 316, § 7.

CSA:

C. 72, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-7.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 518, § 8, effective July 1.

16-19-109. Manner and place of execution.

The warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom directed to arrest the accused at any time and any place where he may be found within the state and to command the aid of all peace officers or other persons in the execution of the warrant and to deliver the accused, subject to the provisions of this article, to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 316, § 8.

CSA:

C. 72, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-8.

16-19-110. Authority of arresting officer.

Every peace officer or other person empowered to make the arrest shall have the same authority, in arresting the accused, to command assistance therein as peace officers have by law in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 316, § 9.

CSA:

C. 72, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-9.

Cross references:

For general authority of peace officer in making arrests, see part 1 of article 3 of this title 16.

16-19-111. Rights of accused - habeas corpus.

No person arrested upon such a warrant shall be delivered over to the agent whom the executive authority demanding him has appointed to receive him unless he shall first be taken forthwith before a judge of a court of record in this state, who shall inform him of the demand made for his surrender and of the crime with which he is charged and that he has the right to demand and procure legal counsel. If the prisoner or his counsel states that he or they desire to test the legality of his arrest, the judge of the court of record shall fix a reasonable time to be allowed him within which to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. When such writ is applied for, notice thereof, and of the time and place of hearing thereon, shall be given to the prosecuting officer of the county in which the arrest is made and in which the accused is in custody and to the agent of the demanding state. Review beyond the court of record shall be only in the supreme court by petition for certiorari, pursuant to such rules as that court may promulgate.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 316, § 10.

CSA:

C. 72, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-10.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 735, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For procedural requirements in habeas corpus, see C.R.C.P. 106; for jurisdiction of the supreme court on writs of certiorari, see C.A.R. 49 to 56.

16-19-112. Penalty for noncompliance.

Any person who delivers to the agent for extradition of the demanding state a person in his or her custody under the governor's warrant, in willful disobedience to section 16-19-111, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 317, § 11.

CSA:

C. 72, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-11.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3164, § 175, effective March 1, 2022.

16-19-113. Confinement in jail.

The officer or person executing the governor's warrant of arrest, or the agent of the demanding state to whom the prisoner has been delivered, when necessary, may confine the prisoner in the jail in any county or city through which he may pass. The keeper of the jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or person having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route, such person being chargeable with the expense of keeping. The officer or agent of a demanding state to whom a prisoner has been delivered following extradition proceedings in another state, or to whom a prisoner has been delivered after waiving extradition in such other state, and who is passing through this state with the prisoner for the purpose of immediately returning the prisoner to the demanding state, when necessary, may confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he may pass. The keeper of the jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or agent having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route, such officer or agent, however, being chargeable with the expense of keeping; but the officer or agent shall produce and show to the keeper of the jail satisfactory written evidence of the fact that he is actually transporting such prisoner to the demanding state after a requisition by the executive authority of the demanding state. The prisoner shall not be entitled to demand a new requisition while in this state.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 317, § 12.

CSA:

C. 72, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-12.

16-19-114. Arrest prior to requisition.

When any person within this state is charged on the oath of any credible person before any judge of this state with the commission of any crime in any other state and, except in cases arising under section 16-19-107, with having fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of his bail, probation, or parole, or whenever complaint has been made before any judge in this state setting forth on the affidavit of any credible person in another state that a crime has been committed in the other state and that the accused has been charged in such state with the commission of the crime, and, except in cases arising under section 16-19-107, has fled from justice or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of his bail, probation, or parole, and is believed to be in this state, the judge shall issue a warrant directed to any peace officer commanding him to apprehend the person named therein, wherever he may be found in this state, and to bring him before the same or any other judge or court which may be available in or convenient of access to the place where the arrest may be made, to answer the charge or complaint and affidavit, and a certified copy of the sworn charge or complaint and affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall be attached to the warrant.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 317, § 13.

CSA:

C. 72, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-13.

L. 57:

p. 379, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-13.

16-19-115. Arrest without warrant.

The arrest of a person may be lawfully made also by any peace officer or a private person without a warrant upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of a state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year. When so arrested the accused must be taken before a judge with all practicable speed, and complaint must be made against him under oath setting forth the ground for arrest as in section 16-19-114; and thereafter his answer shall be heard as if he had been arrested on a warrant.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 318, § 14.

CSA:

C. 72, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-14.

16-19-116. Commitment to await requisition - bail.

If from the examination before the judge it appears that the person held is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged and, except in cases arising under section 16-19-107, that he or she has fled from justice, the judge shall, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit him or her to the county jail for such a time not exceeding thirty-five days and as specified in the warrant as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the governor on a requisition of the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused gives bail as provided in section 16-19-117, or until he or she is legally discharged.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 318, § 15.

CSA:

C. 72, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-15.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 861, § 98, effective July 1.

16-19-117. Bail pending extradition.

Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state or territory or country in which it is alleged to have been committed, or having been convicted of a crime in the demanding state, the fugitive is alleged to have escaped from custody or confinement in the demanding state or to have violated the terms of his or her bail, probation, parole, or sentence, or the fugitive has executed a written waiver of extradition pursuant to section 16-19-126, the judge of any district court within the state of Colorado may admit any person arrested, held, or detained for extradition or interstate rendition to another state or territory of the United States or to any foreign country, to bail by bond or undertaking, with such sufficient sureties and in such sum as such judge deems proper, conditioned upon the appearance of such person before the court at a time specified in the bond or undertaking and for such person's surrender upon the warrant of the governor of this state for such person's extradition or interstate rendition to another state or territory of the United States or to any foreign country. When any such person has been served with a governor's warrant, such person shall no longer be eligible to be admitted to bail.

Before granting the bond provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the judge of the district court within the state of Colorado to whom such application for bail is made shall cause reasonable notice to be served upon the district attorney of the judicial district within which an application is made and also upon the person or authority holding or detaining the person.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 319, § 16.

CSA:

C. 72, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-16.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1729, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 620, § 1, effective May 27.

16-19-118. Extension of time.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant or bond, a judge of a district court shall either recommit him or her for a further period not to exceed sixty days or again take bail for his or her appearance and surrender, as provided in section 16-19-117, but within a period not to exceed sixty days after the date of the new bond.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 319, § 17.

CSA:

C. 72, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-17.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 353, § 1, effective July 1.

16-19-119. Forfeiture of bail.

If the person so held is admitted to bail as provided for in section 16-19-117 and fails to appear and surrender himself according to the conditions of his bond, the judge of the district court, by proper order, shall declare the bond forfeited and order his immediate arrest without warrant if he is within this state. Recovery may be had on such bond in the name of the people of the state of Colorado as in the case of other bonds or undertakings given by a defendant in criminal proceedings.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 319, § 18.

CSA:

C. 72, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-18.

16-19-119.5. Custody pending arrival of agent of the demanding state.

Upon ordering the delivery of a fugitive forthwith to the agent of a demanding state, a judge shall allow the agent of the demanding state a period of not less than fifteen days and not more than thirty days from the date of the order within which to complete transportation arrangements, travel to this state, and appear to take custody of the fugitive. During this period, pending the arrival of the agent of the demanding state, the fugitive shall remain in custody in this state without bail and shall not be discharged.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 340, § 1, effective July 1.

16-19-120. Persons under prosecution when demanded.

If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against a person under the laws of this state and is still pending, the governor, in his discretion, subject to such criminal prosecution, either may surrender him on demand of the executive authority of another state or hold him until he has been tried and discharged or convicted and punished in this state.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 319, § 19.

CSA:

C. 72, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-19.

16-19-121. When guilt inquired into.

The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime of which he is charged may not be inquired into by the governor or in any proceedings after the demand for extradition accompanied by a charge of crime in legal form has been presented to the governor, except as it may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the crime.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 320, § 20.

CSA:

C. 72, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-20.

16-19-122. Governor may recall warrant.

The governor may recall his warrant of arrest or may issue another warrant whenever he deems proper.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 320, § 21.

CSA:

C. 72, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-21.

16-19-123. Fugitives from this state.

When the governor of this state demands a person charged with crime or with escaping from confinement or breaking the terms of his bail, probation, or parole in this state from the executive authority of any other state or from the chief justice or an associate justice of the supreme court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive such demand under the laws of the United States, he shall issue a warrant under the seal of this state, to some agent, commanding him to receive the person so charged if delivered to him and convey him to the proper officer of the county in this state in which the offense was committed.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 320, § 22.

CSA:

C. 72, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-22.

L. 57:

p. 380, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-22.

16-19-124. Application for requisition.

When the return to this state of a person charged with crime in this state is required, the district attorney shall present to the governor his written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged, in which application shall be stated the name of the person so charged, the crime charged against him, the approximate time, place, and circumstances of its commission, and the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of the accused therein at the time the application is made, and certifying that, in the opinion of the said district attorney, the ends of justice require the arrest and return of the accused to this state for trial and that the proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.

When the return to this state is required of a person who has been convicted of a crime in this state and has escaped from confinement or broken the terms of his bail, probation, or parole, the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offense was committed, the state board of parole, or the superintendent of the institution or sheriff of the county from which escape was made shall present to the governor a written application for a requisition for the return of such person, in which application shall be stated the name of the person, the crime of which he was convicted, the circumstances of his escape from confinement or of the breach of the terms of his bail, probation, or parole, and the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of the person therein at the time application is made.

The application shall be verified by affidavit, shall be executed in duplicate, and shall be accompanied by two certified copies of the indictment returned, or information and affidavit filed, or of the complaint made to the judge, stating the offense with which the accused is charged, or of the judgment of conviction or of the sentence. The prosecuting officer, state board of parole, superintendent, or sheriff may also attach such further affidavits and other documents in duplicate as he deems proper to be submitted with such application. One copy of the application, with the action of the governor indicated by endorsement thereon, and one of the certified copies of the indictment, complaint, information, and affidavits or of the judgment of conviction or of the sentence shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state to remain of record in that office. The other copies of all papers shall be forwarded with the governor's requisition.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 320, § 23.

CSA:

C. 72, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-23.

L. 57:

p. 380, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-23.

L. 76:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 533, § 13, effective April 9.

16-19-125. Immunity from civil process.

A person brought into this state by, or after waiver of, extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to service of personal process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceeding to answer which he is being or has been returned, until he has been convicted in the criminal proceeding, or, if acquitted, until he has had reasonable opportunity to return to the state from which he was extradited.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 321, § 24.

CSA:

C. 72, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-24.

16-19-126. Written waiver of extradition.

Any person arrested in this state charged with having committed any crime in another state or alleged to have escaped from confinement or broken the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole may waive the issuance and service of the warrant provided for in sections 16-19-108 and 16-19-109 and all other procedure incidental to extradition proceedings by executing or subscribing in the presence of a judge of any court of record within this state a writing which states that he or she consents to return to the demanding state and acknowledging that he or she shall not be admitted to bail; but, before the waiver is executed or subscribed by such person, it is the duty of the judge to inform such person of his or her rights to the issuance and service of a warrant of extradition and to obtain a writ of habeas corpus as provided for in section 16-19-111.

If and when a consent has been duly executed, it shall forthwith be forwarded to the office of the governor of this state and filed therein. The judge shall direct the officer having the person in custody to deliver such person forthwith to the duly accredited agent or agents of the demanding state and shall deliver or cause to be delivered to that agent or those agents a copy of the consent. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the rights of the accused person to return voluntarily and without formality to the demanding state, nor shall this waiver procedure be deemed to be an exclusive procedure or to limit the powers, rights, or duties of the officers of the demanding state or of this state.

A fugitive shall not be permitted to withdraw a waiver of extradition unless the fugitive makes a showing of good cause for the withdrawal of the waiver of extradition. The fugitive shall provide the court, governor, and district attorney with the request to withdraw the waiver of extradition stating the reasons for withdrawing the waiver. If the court grants the withdrawal, it shall provide the governor with an order permitting the withdrawal of the waiver of extradition. A judge shall commit a fugitive who is permitted to withdraw his or her waiver of extradition to the county jail without bond for a specified period of time, of not less than thirty days and not more than ninety days, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under warrant of the governor or on a requisition of the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 321, § 24-A.

CSA:

C. 72, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-25.

L. 57:

p. 381, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-25.

L. 2005:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 620, § 2, effective May 27.

16-19-126.5. Prior waiver of extradition.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a law enforcement agency in the state of Colorado holding a person who is alleged to have broken the terms of such person's probation, parole, bail, or any other conditional release in the demanding state shall immediately deliver the person to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state without the requirement of a demand by the executive authority of the demanding state, and without the requirement of a governor's warrant issued by the governor of the state of Colorado, if such person has signed a prior waiver of extradition as a condition of such person's current probation, parole, bail, or other conditional release in the demanding state.

The law enforcement agency shall immediately deliver any person pursuant to subsection (1) of this section upon the receipt of the following documents, which shall be accepted as conclusive proof of the contents of such documents and of the validity of the waiver set forth therein:

A certified copy of the prior waiver of extradition signed by the person being held by the law enforcement agency, or an electronically or electromagnetically transmitted facsimile thereof;

A certified copy of an order or warrant from the demanding state directing the return of the person for violating the conditions of such person's probation, parole, bail, or other conditional release, or an electronically or electromagnetically transmitted facsimile thereof; and

A photograph, fingerprints, or other evidence which identifies the person held by the law enforcement agency as the person who signed the waiver of extradition and who is named in the order or warrant, or an electronically or electromagnetically transmitted facsimile thereof.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the right, power, or privilege of the state of Colorado to hold, try, and punish any person demanded by another state for any crime committed in the state of Colorado before delivering such person to the demanding state.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1729, § 10, effective July 1.

16-19-127. Nonwaiver by this state.

Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to constitute a waiver by this state of its right, power, or privilege to try such demanded person for any crime committed within this state, or of its right, power, or privilege to regain custody of such person by extradition proceedings or otherwise for the purpose of trial, sentence, or punishment for any crime committed within this state, nor shall any proceedings had under this article which result in, or fail to result in, extradition be deemed a waiver by this state of any of its rights, privileges, or jurisdiction in any way whatsoever.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 322, § 24-B.

CSA:

C. 72, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-26.

16-19-128. Prosecution of other charges.

After a person has been brought back to this state by, or after waiver of, extradition proceedings, he may be tried in this state for other crimes which he may be charged with committing here as well as that specified in the requisition for his extradition.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 322, § 25.

CSA:

C. 72, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-27.

16-19-129. Security for costs - default - fees.

In all cases where complaint is made against any fugitive from justice, the judge or justice in his discretion may require from complainant good and sufficient security for the payment of all costs which may accrue from the arrest and detention of such fugitive, which security shall be by bond to the clerk of the district court, conditioned for the payment of costs, which bond, together with a statement of the costs which have accrued on the examination, shall be returned to the office of the clerk of the district court. Upon the determination of the proceedings against the fugitive within that county, the clerk shall issue a fee bill as in other cases, to be served on the persons named in the bond, or any of them, which fee bill shall be served and returned by the sheriff, for which he shall be allowed the same fees as are given him for serving notices. If the fees are not paid on or before the first day of the next district court to be held in and for that county, nor any cause then shown why they should not be paid, the clerk may issue an execution for the same against those parties on whom the fee bill has been served and when the fees are collected shall pay over the same to the persons respectively entitled thereto. The clerk shall be entitled to one dollar for his trouble in each case, besides the usual taxed fees which are allowed in other cases for like services. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the clerk from instituting suits on said bonds in the ordinary mode of judicial proceedings, if he deems it proper. The costs which may accrue from the arrest and detention of such fugitive, as described in this section, shall include any reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the district attorney which are directly the result of the prosecution of such fugitive from justice. When such costs are recovered by the clerk, such costs shall be remitted to the office of the district attorney which incurred such costs.

For purposes of this section, reasonable costs incurred by the district attorney include but are not limited to those in section 18-1.3-701, C.R.S., as well as attorney fees and support staff costs.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 323, § 30.

CSA:

C. 72, § 75.

CRS 53:

§ 60-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-28.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 430, § 8, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1499, § 155, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-19-130. Rewards - how audited - paid.

When the governor is satisfied that the crime of murder or arson or kidnapping has been committed within the state, and that the person charged therewith has not been arrested or has escaped therefrom, he may in his discretion offer a reward not exceeding one thousand dollars for the arrest and delivery to the proper authorities of the person so charged, which reward, upon the certificate of the governor that the same has been earned, shall be audited and paid by the state out of any funds appropriated for that purpose.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 323, § 31.

CSA:

C. 72, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 60-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-29.

16-19-131. Escape - reward.

If any person charged with or convicted of a felony breaks prison or escapes or flees from justice or absconds and secretes himself, it shall be lawful for the governor, if he judges it necessary, to offer any reward not exceeding two hundred dollars for apprehending and delivering such person into custody of the sheriff or other officer as he may direct. Upon the person or persons so apprehending and delivering any such person and producing the sheriff's or justice's receipt for the body to the governor, it shall be lawful for the governor to certify the amount of the claim to the controller, who shall issue his warrant on the treasury for the same.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 323, § 32.

CSA:

C. 72, § 77.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-30.

L. 72:

p. 560, § 23.

Cross references:

For definitions of "escape", see § 18-8-208.

16-19-132. Interpretation.

The provisions of this article shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purposes to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 322, § 26.

CSA:

C. 72, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 60-1-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-31.

16-19-133. Concealment of fugitives - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 497, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 60-1-34.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 878, § 44, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 709, § 1, effective March 30.

L. 86:

Entire section repealed, p. 772, § 15, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

16-19-134. Securing the attendance of a defendant who is outside the United States.

When a criminal action for an offense committed in this state is pending in a criminal court of this state against a defendant who is in a foreign country with which the United States has an extradition treaty, and when the accusatory instrument charges an offense that is declared in the treaty to be an extraditable offense, and when the district attorney of the judicial district in which the offense was allegedly committed desires the international extradition of the defendant, the district attorney shall apply to the governor, requesting the governor to apply to the president of the United States, to institute extradition proceedings for the return of the defendant to this country and state for the purpose of prosecution of the action. The district attorney's application shall comply with the rules, regulations, and guidelines established by the governor for such applications and shall be accompanied by all of the accusatory instruments, affidavits, and other documents required by the governor's rules, regulations, and guidelines.

Upon receipt of the district attorney's application, the governor, if satisfied that the defendant is in the foreign country in question, that the offense charged is an extraditable offense pursuant to the treaty in question, and that there are no factors or impediments which in law may preclude such an extradition, may in his or her discretion submit an application, addressed to the secretary of state of the United States, requesting that the president of the United States institute extradition proceedings for the return of the defendant from the foreign country. The governor's application shall comply with the rules, regulations, and guidelines established by the secretary of state of the United States for such applications and shall be accompanied by all of the accusatory instruments, affidavits, and other documents required by such rules, regulations, and guidelines.

Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution in another country of a fugitive from justice charged with committing a crime in Colorado, if the other country offers domestic prosecution of such fugitives as an alternative to extradition. This includes, but is not limited to, prosecution in Mexico pursuant to the Mexican federal penal code.

The provisions of this section also apply equally to extradition or attempted extradition of a person who is a fugitive following the entry of a judgment of conviction against him or her in a criminal court of this state.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 353, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 342, § 7, effective July 1.